Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.416

[Art. 48] Contempts.

A military court may punish for contempt any person who uses any menacing word, sign, or gesture in its presence, or who disturbs its proceedings by any riot or disorder. The punishment may not exceed confinement for thirty days or a fine of one hundred dollars, or both.

[ 1963 c 220 s 50.]